Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4063.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Study committee on law enforcement officer salaries and response times; membership; duties; report; delayed repeal A. The study committee on law enforcement officer salaries and response times is established and consists of the following members: 1. The chairperson of the senate public safety committee. 2. The chairperson of the house of representatives public safety and law enforcement committee. 3. The chairperson of the senate government committee. 4. The chairperson of the house of representatives government committee. 5. The ranking minority member of the senate public safety committee. 6. The ranking minority member of the house of representatives public safety and law enforcement committee. B. Committee members are not eligible to receive compensation, but are eligible for reimbursement of expenses under title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes. C. The committee shall: 1. Study and examine the number of employees and employee salaries in law enforcement agencies in cities or towns with populations of more than one hundred fifty thousand persons. 2. Examine the response times and efficiency of law enforcement agencies and suggest any improvements. 3. On or before October 1, 2027, submit a report regarding the committee's activities and recommendations to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. D. This section is repealed from and after September 30, 2028.